apertium-mag.mag.twol
Alphabet
 A Ā I Ī U Ū Ṛ Ṝ Ḷ Ḹ E Ē F O Ō K G Ṅ H C J Ñ Y Ś Ṭ Ḍ Ṇ R Ṣ T D N L S P B M V W Ṃ Ḥ
 a ā i ī u ū ṛ ṝ ḷ ḹ e ē f o ō k g ṅ h c j ñ y ś ṭ ḍ ṇ r ṣ t d n l s p b m v w ṃ ḥ 
 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 0 १ २ ३ ४ ५ ६ ७ ८ ९ ०
!don't have letters q, x, z

%{ā%}:ā %{ā%}:0
%{e%}:e %{e%}:0
%{T%}:s %{T%}:t
%{I%}:i %{I%}:e
%{W%}:w %{W%}:y
%{a%}:a %{a%}:0 ;

Sets

Vowel = A Ā I Ī U Ū Ṛ Ṝ Ḷ Ḹ E Ē O Ō
        a ā i ī u ū ṛ ṝ ḷ ḹ e ē o ō ;

Rules

"realise {a} as null if after ā"
%{a%}:0 <=> :ā %>:0 _ ;

"realise {e} as null if after a morpheme-final vowel"
%{e%}:0 <=> :Vowel %>:0 _ ;

"tetanā should be tetan, so realize {ā} as null after tetan"
%{ā%}:0 <=> :t %>:0 :e :t :a :n _ ;

"nayā -> nayā+ī -> nayī"
%{ā%}:0 <=> _ %>:0 :Vowel ;

"realize {T} as t in 'taisan' 'tetan' 'taise' 'tahāṃ' 'tab' and s everywhere else"
%{T%}:t <=> _ %>:0 :a :i :s :a :n ;
            _ %>:0 :e :t :a :n ;
            _ %>:0 :a :i :s :e ;
            _ %>:0 :a :h :ā :ṃ ;
            _ %>:0 :a :b ;

"realize {I} as e if it is before a syllable boundary, otherwise i"
%{I%}:e <=> %>:0 _ ;

"yā after i and wā everywhere else"
%{W%}:y <=> :i %>:0 _ ;

! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
